nb: Koaksialkabelserie: LMR-195; LMR-240; LMR-400; RG-11; RG-174; RG-213; RG-58; RG-59; RG-6; Annet
vi: Dòng cáp đồng trục: LMR-195; LMR-240; LMR-400; RG-11; RG-174; RG-213; RG-58; RG-59; RG-6; Khác
cs: Série koaxiálního kabelu: LMR-195; LMR-240; LMR-400; RG-11; RG-174; RG-213; RG-58; RG-59; RG-6; Jiné
de: Koaxialkabel-Serie: LMR-195; LMR-240; LMR-400; RG-11; RG-174; RG-213; RG-58; RG-59; RG-6; Sonstiges
tr: Koaksiyel kablo serisi: LMR-195; LMR-240; LMR-400; RG-11; RG-174; RG-213; RG-58; RG-59; RG-6; Diğer
lt-LT: Koaksialinio kabelio serija: LMR-195; LMR-240; LMR-400; RG-11; RG-174; RG-213; RG-58; RG-59; RG-6; Kita
fi: Koaksiaalikaapelisarja: LMR-195; LMR-240; LMR-400; RG-11; RG-174; RG-213; RG-58; RG-59; RG-6; Muu
it: Serie del cavo coassiale: LMR-195; LMR-240; LMR-400; RG-11; RG-174; RG-213; RG-58; RG-59; RG-6; Altro
zh-CN: 同轴电缆系列: LMR-195; LMR-240; LMR-400; RG-11; RG-174; RG-213; RG-58; RG-59; RG-6; 其他
el: Σειρά ομοαξονικού καλωδίου: LMR-195; LMR-240; LMR-400; RG-11; RG-174; RG-213; RG-58; RG-59; RG-6; Άλλο
zh-TW: 同軸纜線系列: LMR-195; LMR-240; LMR-400; RG-11; RG-174; RG-213; RG-58; RG-59; RG-6; 其他
bg-BG: Серии на коаксиален кабел: LMR-195; LMR-240; LMR-400; RG-11; RG-174; RG-213; RG-58; RG-59; RG-6; Други
nl: Serie coaxkabel: LMR-195; LMR-240; LMR-400; RG-11; RG-174; RG-213; RG-58; RG-59; RG-6; Andere
sv: Koaxialkabelserie: LMR-195; LMR-240; LMR-400; RG-11; RG-174; RG-213; RG-58; RG-59; RG-6; Övrigt
pt-PT: Série de cabo coaxial: LMR-195; LMR-240; LMR-400; RG-11; RG-174; RG-213; RG-58; RG-59; RG-6; Outro
ro-RO: Serie cablu coaxial: LMR-195; LMR-240; LMR-400; RG-11; RG-174; RG-213; RG-58; RG-59; RG-6; Altele
pl: Seria kabla koncentrycznego: LMR-195; LMR-240; LMR-400; RG-11; RG-174; RG-213; RG-58; RG-59; RG-6; Inne
da: Koaksialkabelserie: LMR-195; LMR-240; LMR-400; RG-11; RG-174; RG-213; RG-58; RG-59; RG-6; Andet
pt-BR: Série de cabo coaxial: LMR-195; LMR-240; LMR-400; RG-11; RG-174; RG-213; RG-58; RG-59; RG-6; Outro
hr-HR: Serija koaksijalnog kabela: LMR-195; LMR-240; LMR-400; RG-11; RG-174; RG-213; RG-58; RG-59; RG-6; Ostalo
en: Coaxial cable series: LMR-195; LMR-240; LMR-400; RG-11; RG-174; RG-213; RG-58; RG-59; RG-6; Other
ru: Серия коаксиального кабеля: LMR-195; LMR-240; LMR-400; RG-11; RG-174; RG-213; RG-58; RG-59; RG-6; Другой
es: Serie del cable coaxial: LMR-195; LMR-240; LMR-400; RG-11; RG-174; RG-213; RG-58; RG-59; RG-6; Otros
hu: Koaxiális kábel sorozata: LMR-195; LMR-240; LMR-400; RG-11; RG-174; RG-213; RG-58; RG-59; RG-6; Egyéb
sk-SK: Séria koaxiálneho kábla: LMR-195; LMR-240; LMR-400; RG-11; RG-174; RG-213; RG-58; RG-59; RG-6; Iné
ja: 同軸ケーブルシリーズ: LMR-195; LMR-240; LMR-400; RG-11; RG-174; RG-213; RG-58; RG-59; RG-6; その他
sl-SI: Serija koaksialnega kabla: LMR-195; LMR-240; LMR-400; RG-11; RG-174; RG-213; RG-58; RG-59; RG-6; Drugo
ko: 동축 케이블 시리즈: LMR-195; LMR-240; LMR-400; RG-11; RG-174; RG-213; RG-58; RG-59; RG-6; 기타
fr: Série du câble coaxial: LMR-195; LMR-240; LMR-400; RG-11; RG-174; RG-213; RG-58; RG-59; RG-6; Autre
th: ซีรีส์สายโคแอกเซียล: LMR-195; LMR-240; LMR-400; RG-11; RG-174; RG-213; RG-58; RG-59; RG-6; อื่นๆ